Massachusetts, session 194th, H4474.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the personnel
administrator shall certify any active employee, who has served in a civil service position in the
city of Worcester as a provisional employee or under a provisional promotion for at least 6
months prior to June 1, 2025, to permanent civil service status in that position.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all civilian
employee positions of the city of Worcester, including in the school department, shall be exempt
from chapter 31 of the General Laws, subject to section 3.
SECTION 3. Nothing in this act shall impair the civil service status of a tenured
employee holding a civil service position in the city of Worcester as of the effective date of this
act.
of 2

SECTION 4. This act shall not apply to police officers and firefighters of the city of
Worcester.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2